Utah statutes.
31A-22-1202.   Other reinsurance contracts.

(1)  If there is no assumption agreement under Subsection 31A-22-1201(2), the reinsurer's sole obligation is to the ceding insurer.

(2)  No guaranty fund, security fund, or any other person, except the estate of the ceding insurer, has a claim against a reinsurer.

(3)  Subject to contractual rights of offset, if a ceding insurer is put into receivership, the reinsurer shall pay any amount due under the contract in full, without reduction because of the receivership:

(a)  to the domiciliary receiver if there is one; or

(b)  if there is not domiciliary receiver, to a Utah receiver.



Amended by Chapter 257, 2008 General Session

